Massachusetts, session 194th, H1224.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17O the following section:-
Section 17P. Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of
the commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission shall provide coverage for
biennial echocardiogram and concussion analysis for persons between the ages of five and
eighteen.
SECTION 2. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 47II, the following section:-
of 2

Section 47JJ. Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within the commonwealth that provides medical expense coverage shall
provide coverage for biennial echocardiogram and concussion analysis for persons between the
ages of five and eighteen.
SECTION 3. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 8KK the following section:-
Section 8LL. Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual
or group hospital service plan which is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth
shall provide coverage for biennial echocardiogram and concussion analysis for persons between
the ages of five and eighteen.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4KK, the following section:-
Section 4LL. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement delivered, issued, or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for
biennial echocardiogram and concussion analysis for persons between the ages of five and
eighteen.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4CC the following section:-
Section 4DD. Any individual or group health maintenance contract shall provide
coverage for biennial echocardiogram and concussion analysis for persons between the ages of
five and eighteen.
of 2